Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-556
Waters of state; pollution; carcasses; prohibitions; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place the carcass of any dead animal, fish, or bird in or near any of the waters of this state or leave such carcass where the whole or any part thereof may be washed or carried into any of the waters of this state. Any person guilty of violating this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor, and every day that any such unlawful act continues or is permitted to continue shall constitute a separate offense and be punishable as such.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 17, p. 432;

C.S.1929, § 37-517;

R.S.1943, § 37-517;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 192;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-517;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 276;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 82.